Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0790.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 695. (1) Except as otherwise provided under this section, the revenue collected under this part shall be distributed to the general fund. If the amendatory act that added section 51h takes effect before April 18, 2023, then for the 2021-2022 state fiscal year only, from the tax levied under this part, $800,000,000.00 of the revenue collected is appropriated and must be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Michigan taxpayer rebate fund created in section 51h, and the balance of the revenue collected under this part for that state fiscal year shall be deposited to the general fund. (2) Beginning with the 2022-2023 state fiscal year through the 2024-2025 state fiscal year, from the tax levied under this part, the revenue collected under this part shall be deposited in the following manner: (a) Up to $1,200,000,000.00 to the general fund. (b) After the deposit under subdivision (a), up to $50,000,000.00, if available, to the Michigan housing and community development fund created in section 58a of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458a. (c) After the deposits under subdivisions (a) and (b), up to $50,000,000.00, if available, to the revitalization and placemaking fund created in section 696. (d) After the deposits under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), up to $500,000,000.00, if available, to the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in section 4 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254. (e) The balance of any revenue collected under this part after the deposits under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), to the general fund. (3) Beginning with the 2025-2026 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, from the tax levied under this part, the revenue collected under this part must be deposited in the following manner: (a) $50,000,000.00 of the revenue collected under this part shall be deposited to the Michigan housing and community development fund created in section 58a of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458a. , and the (b) After the deposit under subdivision (a), if available, $250,000.00 or an amount sufficient to fund any National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) related grant, fellowship, and internship programs offered by the Michigan space grant consortium (MSGC), including administrative costs, whichever is greater, to the Michigan strategic fund and transferred to the Michigan economic development corporation. The Michigan economic development corporation must use the funds received under this subdivision to support the MSGC and allow for the sponsorship of undergraduate and graduate students who are residents of this state that apply for any NASA related grant, fellowship, or internship program offered by the MSGC. (c) The balance of the revenue collected under this part for that state fiscal year shall be deposited after the deposits under subdivisions (a) and (b), to the general fund.